Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-512
Health care facilities; provider agencies; adopt procedures.

All health care facilities and provider agencies subject to sections 71-507 to 71-513 shall adopt written procedures regarding infectious diseases or conditions which address preexposure safeguards, notification procedures, and postexposure risk-reduction methods.

Laws 1989, LB 157, § 6;

Laws 1997, LB 138, § 51.